Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Personal Privacy Protection Act:

(1) Nonprofit organization means a nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(2) Person means any individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, firm, or agent or employee of any such individual or business entity;

(3) Personal information means any list, record, register, registry, roll, roster, or other compilation of data that directly or indirectly identifies a person as a member, supporter, or volunteer of, or donor of financial or nonfinancial support to, any nonprofit organization; and

(4) Public agency means any state or local governmental unit, including, but not limited to:

(a) The State of Nebraska;

(b) Any agency, department, division, office, commission, board, bureau, committee, council, or other entity of the state;

(c) The University of Nebraska or any state college;

(d) Any political subdivision of the state, including, but not limited to, any county, city, village, township, school district, community college area, public power district, rural fire district, or other local governmental unit, or agency, authority, council, board, or commission thereof;

(e) Any state or local court, tribunal, or other judicial or quasi-judicial body; or

(f) Any public corporation whose primary function is to act as an instrumentality or agency of the state or of any other public agency.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 18.